Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB71.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 173.490 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) One-third (1/3) of the persons first appointed to the board shall serve for a
term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and one-
third (1/3) for a term of four (4) years. Where the board consists of a number
of members not divisible by three (3), one-third (1/3) of the next higher
number divisible by three (3), shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third
(1/3) for a term of three (3) years, and the remaining number shall serve for a
term of four (4) years. Thereafter, as their terms expire, the board shall make
recommendations on their successors, who shall be appointed as set out in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The board shall recommend one (1) person[two (2) persons] committed to the
provision of library services to [the Department for Libraries and Archives for
each vacancy. The names shall be forwarded to the Department for Libraries
and Archives and the state librarian and commissioner shall recommend those
names to ]the county judge/executive for each vacancy. The county
judge/executive[ shall immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court,
make the selection from those recommended unless the fiscal court has
adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a
resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the
county judge/executive]:
1.[ a.] May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the
selection from the name[those] recommended by the board[state
librarian and commissioner]; or[and]
[b. For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to
fill from the first recommendations, shall request the Department
Page 1 of 6
SB007110.100 - 264 - XXXX 2/28/2025 10:29 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 71/GA
for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two
(2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled
appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make
the selection from those recommendations; and]
2. Shall, if he or she determines that the person recommended by the
board is unacceptable,[For any remaining unfilled appointments after
the provisions of subparagraph 1. of this paragraph have been followed,
shall] appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, individuals of his or
her choosing no earlier[later] than thirty (30) days and no later than
sixty (60) days after the day the county judge/executive received the
recommendation[recommendations] under subparagraph 1.[.b.] of this
paragraph and made no appointment therefrom.[ The county
judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives
of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this
subparagraph.]
(c) Board members [thus appointed ]shall serve a term of four (4) years each,
and[. Trustees] may serve for two (2) consecutive terms after which they shall
not succeed themselves. They may be reappointed no earlier than twelve (12)
months following the end of their last service. The members shall hold office
until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. After absence of
a trustee from four (4) regular monthly meetings of the board during any one
(1) year of the trustee's term, the trustee shall be considered to have
automatically resigned from the board. An advisory board may be appointed
and serve as specified in the bylaws of the board of trustees.
(2) Any vacancy occurring in the terms of office of members shall be filled for the
unexpired term by the county judge/executive, with the approval of the fiscal
court.[, by appointment on recommendation of the state librarian and commissioner
Page 2 of 6
SB007110.100 - 264 - XXXX 2/28/2025 10:29 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 71/GA
of two (2) names of persons committed to the provision of library services and
living in the county in which the vacancy occurred unless the fiscal court has
adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For
fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process,] The county
judge/executive:
(a) [1. ]May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the
appointment on the recommendation of the board[state librarian and
commissioner] of the name of one (1) person [two (2) names of
persons] committed to the provision of library services and living in the
county in which the vacancy occurred; or[and
2. If the county judge/executive decides not to make the appointment from
the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries
and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional
recommended persons for the unfilled appointment, and, with the
approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those
recommendations; and]
(b) Shall, if he or she determines that the person recommended by the board is
unacceptable,[For any remaining unfilled appointment after the provisions of
paragraph (a) of this subsection have been followed, shall] appoint, with the
approval of the fiscal court, an individual of his or her choosing no
earlier[later] than thirty (30) days and no later than sixty (60) days after the
day the county judge/executive received the
recommendation[recommendations] under paragraph (a)[2.] of this
subsection and made no appointment therefrom. Any person appointed in
accordance with this paragraph shall be committed to the provision of library
services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred.[ The county
judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the
Page 3 of 6
SB007110.100 - 264 - XXXX 2/28/2025 10:29 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 71/GA
name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this paragraph.]
(3) A member of the board may be removed from office as provided by KRS 65.007.
Section 2. KRS 173.730 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) One-third (1/3) of the persons first appointed to the board shall serve for a
term of two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years and one-
third (1/3) for a term of four (4) years. Where the board consists of a number
of members not divisible by three (3), one-third (1/3) of the next higher
number divisible by three (3), shall serve for a term of two (2) years, one-third
(1/3) for a term of three (3) years and the remaining number shall serve for a
term of four (4) years. Thereafter, as their terms expire, the board shall make
recommendations on their successors, who shall be appointed as set out in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The board shall recommend one (1) person[two (2) persons] committed to the
provision of library services to [the Department for Libraries and Archives,
for each vacancy. The state librarian and commissioner shall recommend
those names to ]the county judge/executive for each vacancy. The county
judge/executive[ shall immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court,
make the selection from those recommended unless the fiscal court has
adopted an alternative appointment process through the passage of a
resolution. For fiscal courts that adopt an alternative appointment process, the
county judge/executive]:
1. [a. ]May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the
selection from the name[those] recommended by the board[state
librarian and commissioner]; or[and]
[b. For any appointments the county judge/executive decides not to
fill from the first recommendations, shall request the Department
for Libraries and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two
Page 4 of 6
SB007110.100 - 264 - XXXX 2/28/2025 10:29 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 71/GA
(2) additional recommended persons for each unfilled
appointment, and, with the approval of the fiscal court, may make
the selection from those recommendations; and]
2. Shall, if he or she determines that the person recommended by the
board is unacceptable,[For any remaining unfilled appointments after
the provisions of subparagraph 1. of this paragraph have been followed,
shall] appoint, with the approval of the fiscal court, individuals of his or
her choosing no earlier[later] than thirty (30) days and no later than
sixty (60) days after the day the county judge/executive received the
recommendation[recommendations] under [of] subparagraph 1.[.b.] of
this paragraph and made no appointment therefrom.[ The county
judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives
of the name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this
subparagraph.]
(c) Board members [thus appointed ]shall serve a term of four (4) years each,
and[. Trustees] may serve for two (2) consecutive terms after which they shall
not succeed themselves. They may be reappointed no earlier than twelve (12)
months following the end of their last service. The members shall hold office
until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. After absence of
a trustee from four (4) regular monthly meetings of the board during any one
(1) year of the trustee's term, the trustee shall be considered to have
automatically resigned from the board. An advisory board may be appointed
and serve as specified in bylaws of the board of trustees.
(2) Any vacancy occurring in the terms of office of members shall be filled for the
unexpired term by the county judge/executive, with the approval of the fiscal
court.[, by appointment on recommendation of the state librarian and commissioner
of two (2) persons interested in the provision of library services and living in the
Page 5 of 6
SB007110.100 - 264 - XXXX 2/28/2025 10:29 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS SB 71/GA
county in which the vacancy occurred unless the fiscal court has adopted an
alternative appointment process through the passage of a resolution. For fiscal
courts that adopt an alternative appointment process,] The county judge/executive:
(a) [1. ]May immediately, with the approval of the fiscal court, make the
appointment on the recommendation of the board[state librarian and
commissioner] of one (1) person[two (2) persons] interested in the
provision of library services and living in the county in which the
vacancy occurred; or[and
2. If the county judge/executive decides not to make the appointment from
the first recommendations, shall request the Department for Libraries
and Archives to submit within thirty (30) days two (2) additional
recommended persons for the unfilled appointment, and, with the
approval of the fiscal court, may make the selection from those
recommendations; and]
(b) Shall, if he or she determines that the person recommended by the board is
unacceptable,[ For any remaining unfilled appointment after the provisions of
paragraph (a) of this subsection have been followed,] appoint, with the
approval of the fiscal court, an individual of his or her choosing no
earlier[later] than thirty (30) days and no later than sixty (60) days after the
day the county judge/executive received the
recommendation[recommendations] under paragraph (a)[2.] of this
subsection and made no appointment therefrom. Any person appointed in
accordance with this paragraph shall be committed to the provision of library
services and living in the county in which the vacancy occurred.[ The county
judge/executive shall notify the Department for Libraries and Archives of the
name of any individual appointed in the manner set out in this paragraph.]
(3) A member of the board may be removed from office as provided by KRS 65.007.
Page 6 of 6
SB007110.100 - 264 - XXXX 2/28/2025 10:29 AM GA